Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 15 Water Resources Management

46-15-1.
Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

The state of Rhode Island has been endowed with many and abundant sources of water supplies located advantageously, for the most part, throughout the state. The proper development, protection, conservation, and use of these water resources are essential to the health, safety, and welfare of the general public, and to the continued growth and economic development of the state;

In recent years it has become increasingly apparent that water supply management, protection, development, and use must be fully integrated into all statewide planning, and rivers and watershed planning and management processes, and that the allocation of the state’s water resources to all users, purposes, and functions, including water to sustain our natural river and stream systems and natural biotic communities, must be equitably decided and implemented under a process which emphasizes efficiency of use and management, minimization of waste, protection of existing supplies, demand management, drought management, conservation, and all other techniques to ensure that our water resources serve the people of Rhode Island for the longest time, in the most efficient use, and in an environmentally sound manner;

The character and extent of the problems of water resource development, utilization, and control, and the widespread and complex interests which they affect, demand action by the government of the state of Rhode Island in order to deal with these problems in a manner which adequately protects the general welfare of all the citizens of the state;

In order to retain and encourage the expansion of our present industries, and to attract new industries, and to promote the proper growth and desirable economic growth of the entire state, and to sustain the viability of water resource-dependent natural systems, agriculture, and recreation, state government must play an active role in fostering and guiding the management of water resources;

There are state and municipal departments, special districts, private firms, and other agencies in the state who have capabilities and experience in the design, construction, operation, and financing of water supply and transmission facilities, which capabilities and experience must be brought to bear on the total problem of water resources development in a coordinated manner if the proper development, conservation, apportionment, and use of the water resources of the state are to be realized; and

It shall be the duty of the water resources board to regulate the proper development, protection, conservation and use of the water resources of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 461, § 4; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 30, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 159, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 254, § 2.

46-15-1.1.
“Water supply system” defined.

“Water supply system”
means, but is not limited to, a system which sells water registered through a metering device or pumps over fifty (50) million gallons of water per year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 461, § 6.

46-15-2.
Approval of public water supply facilities.

No municipal water department or agency, public water system, including special water districts or private water companies, engaged in the distribution of water for potable purposes shall have any power:

To acquire or take a water supply or an additional water supply from an existing approved source;

To take or condemn lands for any new or additional sources of water supply or for the utilization of supplies;

To extend its supply or distribution mains into a municipality or special water district wherein it has not heretofore legally supplied water;

To construct any extension of its transmission mains;

To extend the boundaries of a special water district; or

To supply water in or for use in any other municipality or civil division of the state which owns and operates a water supply system therein, or in any duly organized special water district supplied with water by another municipal water department or agency, special water district, or private water company, until the municipal water department or agency, special water district, or private water company has first submitted the maps and plans therefor to the director of the department of health, the state planning council and the board, as hereinafter provided, and until the water resources board, after receiving the recommendations of the director of the department of health and the division of statewide planning, shall have approved the recommendations or approved the recommendation with modifications as it may determine to be necessary; provided, however, this subsection shall not apply to any area presently served by any municipal water department or agency, or special water district.

Approval shall not be necessary of any plan or work for the extension of supply or distributing mains or pipes of a municipal water supply plant or special district or private water company into and for the purpose of supplying water in any territory within the limits of the municipality or special district or within the franchise area of the private water company, owning the plant, including territory within the municipal special district or franchise limits which has not been heretofore supplied with the water by the plant, nor for the reconstruction or replacement of existing facilities in connection with an existing plant, wherein the capacity of the plant is in no way increased, nor for the construction of filtration or other treatment facilities which will not in any way increase the amount of water which can be made available from the present sources of supply. Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, a municipal water department, agency, or public water system governed under this section shall review applications for plans or work for the extension of supply or distribution mains or pipes in accordance with the following standards:

The application must not be prohibited by the specific language of the latest water supply system management plan (“WSSMP”) of the public water supply system;

The application must comply with the design and construction standards and specifications established by the public water supply system for the sizing and location for the infrastructure;

The extensions shall not reduce the necessary level of fire protection for the community;

All water main and service connection materials, construction, and inspection required hereunder shall be at the sole cost and expense of the applicant;

The public water supply system shall be granted an easement in a form acceptable to them which shall permit the maintenance, repair, or replacement of water lines and all other related activities;

For applications for single-family residential lots, the applicant must show that:

The existing or proposed well for the property does not meet the well industry standard as described in the department of environmental management regulations for “yield per depth of well chart” which is required by the department of health for a dwelling unit; and

Due to the unique characteristics of the property that the drilling of a new well is not feasible;

For applications located within a public water supply system with limited capacity, applicants for commercial uses/properties shall be governed by the rules established for such connections by the public water supply system, which shall be in accordance with the system’s approved WSSMP.

A public water supply system governed under this section may provide for lower standards for approval for residential property if such standards meet the requirements of the agency’s state-approved WSSMP, and such WSSMP is not expired.

The water resources board shall enforce the provisions of this section, and the superior court by injunction may, upon application of the water resources board, prevent any action to be taken by any municipal water agency or department, special district, or private water company without the approval of the water resources board as required by this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 461, § 4; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 30, § 2; P.L. 2022, ch. 65, § 1, effective June 15, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 66, § 1, effective June 15, 2022.

46-15-2.1.
Appeals.

An applicant may appeal a denial by a public water supply facility made under §

46-15-2(b)

which shall be reviewable by the state agency or commission having jurisdiction over the public water supply facility and thereafter by the superior court pursuant to the standards and timeframes set forth in §

42-35-15

(“administrative procedures”).

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 65, § 2, effective June 15, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 66, § 2, effective June 15, 2022.

46-15-3.
Review of public water supply facilities.

The water resources board shall review all proposals and plans for public water supply systems in accordance with the procedures established in this chapter and shall, with respect to each proposal:

Make findings concerning the location of existing and potential sources of contamination of the public water supply system;

Assess the actual and potential impact of existing and potential sources of contamination of the public water supply system;

Prepare recommendations concerning the location, construction, and treatment of the public water supply system; and

Report its findings, assessment, and recommendation to the directors of health and the division of planning.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 461, § 4; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 30, § 2.

46-15-4.
Procedure for approval of maps and plans.

Whenever the approval of any project as provided in this chapter is required, the application shall be made by the petitioner in writing, the application shall be accompanied by proof of adequate authorization for the project, and such exhibits as may be necessary clearly to indicate the scope of the proposed project, including, but not limited to, a map of the lands to be acquired, if any, and preliminary plans of the works proposed to be constructed. The application shall also show, where applicable, the need for the particular source or sources of supply and the reasons therefor, and shall also indicate the method of determining and providing for the payment of the proper compensation for any and all legal damages to persons or property, whether direct or indirect, which will result from the acquiring of the lands and the execution of the plans. The petition shall also be accomplished by such proof as to the character and purity of the water supply proposed to be acquired or used as the director of the department of health shall require and any proposed method of treatment of the supply.

The water resources board shall thereupon cause public notice to be given in a newspaper of general circulation, at least seven (7) days prior, that on a day and at a place therein specified it will hold a public hearing for the purpose of receiving evidence and hearing arguments from all persons and organizations that may be affected by the proposed project, including the recommendations of the director of the department of health and of the state planning council.

The water resources board shall, upon the day specified in the notice, or upon such subsequent day or days to which it may adjourn the hearing, proceed to examine the maps and plans and to hear the proofs and arguments submitted in support of and in opposition to the proposed project. The water resources board, after a hearing, shall determine whether the plans proposed are justified by public necessity, whether they provide for the proper and safe construction of all work connected therewith, whether they provide for the proper protection of the supply and the watershed from contaminations or provide for the proper treatment of an additional supply, whether the plans are just and equitable to the other municipalities affected thereby and to the inhabitants thereof, particular consideration being given to their present and future necessities for sources of water supply, and whether the plans make fair and equitable provisions for the determination and payment of any and all legal damages to persons and property, both direct and indirect, which will result from the execution of the plans or the acquiring of those lands.

The water resources board shall within ninety (90) days after the close of the hearing, and after consideration of the recommendations of the director of the department of health and of the state planning council, make a final decision in writing, either approving the application, maps, and plans as presented, or under such conditions or with such modifications in the application, maps, and plans as may be determined to be necessary to provide satisfactory compliance by the applicant with any and all of the subjects and matters required to be determined by the water resources board in this subsection, or to bring into cooperation all persons, municipal water departments or agencies, special water districts, or private water companies which may be affected by the project; or it may reject the application entirely or permit another to be filed in lieu thereof, but it shall, however, make a reasonable effort to meet the needs of the applicant, with due regard to the actual or prospective needs, interests, and rights of others which may be affected by the proposed projects.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 461, § 4; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 30, § 2.

46-15-5.
Water supply to other states.

No municipal water departments or agencies, special water districts, or private water companies shall transport or carry through pipes, conduits, ditches, or canals, the waters of any fresh water lake, pond, brook, river, stream, or creek in this state or any well, subsurface, or percolating waters of this state into any other state for use therein except where the consent in writing of the water resources board has been obtained.

A petition in writing for that consent must be filed with the water resources board accompanied by such plans and documents as the water resources board may require. The provisions of §

45-15-4

shall, so far as practicable, apply to all proceedings to be had subsequent to the filing of the petition as if the petition were one filed pursuant to the provision of §

46-15-4

.

The water resources board shall enforce the provisions of this section, and the superior court, by injunction, may, upon an application of the director, prevent any unauthorized diversion or transportation.

Nothing contained herein shall be construed to affect any contracts or other arrangements in existence on September 1, 1990, wherein a municipal water department or agency, special water district, or private water company is supplying to and/or purchasing water from any agency or other entity in another state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 461, § 4; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 30, § 2.

46-15-6.
Supply of water to other water supply systems.

On any application for a new or additional water supply or source of water supply, the water resources board, after obtaining the recommendations of the director of the department of health and the division of planning, may require or authorize any applicant to make provisions for the supply and to supply water to any area of the state which, as determined by the water resources board in its decision on that application, properly should be supplied with water from the source or sources of water supply sought by the applicant.

Any municipal water department or agency, special water district, or private water company within the area may apply to the water resources board for the right to take water from that source of water supply or from any part of the water supply system of the applicant supplied in whole or in part from that source. If the water resources board requires, or if it approves the application, it shall be the duty of the applicant to supply water, subject to such requirements as the water resources board may impose.

The amount of water to be taken and the price to be paid therefor may be agreed upon between the applicant and the taker of the water, or if they cannot agree, fair and reasonable amounts and rates shall be fixed by the administrator of public utilities and carriers; provided, further, that nothing contained in this section shall be construed as diminishing the powers of the administrator of public utilities and carriers in respect to rates of water suppliers subject to his or her jurisdiction.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 461, § 4; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 30, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 461, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 48.

46-15-6.1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 461, § 4; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 30, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 461, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 9, § 11, effective July 1, 2011.

46-15-7.
Authority to enter upon lands and waters for purpose of survey.

The water resources board, its assistants, consultants, employees, subordinates, engineers, surveyors, or other agents or servants, upon giving due notice of intent and purpose, without being liable for trespass, shall have the right, with the consent of the landowner, to enter in, over, and onto any lands or waters in the state along with the equipment and devices as may be necessary and appurtenant for the conducting of examinations, investigations, appraisals, surveys, or other studies and for the making of test pits, pumping tests, borings, and other forms of geologic investigations; provided, however, that in the event the landowner refuses to consent to the entry, the water resources board may petition the superior court for the county in which the lands and waters are located for such authorization which shall be granted upon a showing by the water resources board that the entry is necessary for the implementation of the plans and programs of the board. The petition shall be granted priority on the miscellaneous court calendar. Any landowner whose property is damaged by virtue of the authorization granted herein shall have all of the rights, and shall be subject to all of the limitations, set forth in chapter 31 of title 9.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 461, § 4; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 30, § 2.

46-15-8.
Rules and regulations.

The water resources board is hereby authorized and empowered to make general rules and regulations and to take such actions and issue such orders as may be required for the enforcement of this chapter, and the rules and regulations, in addition hereto and not inconsistent herewith.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 461, § 4; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 30, § 2.

46-15-9.
Powers of health department and department of environmental management not affected.

Nothing contained herein shall be construed to affect the powers granted to the department of health and the department of environmental management pursuant to chapters 12 — 14 and chapter 16 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 461, § 4; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 30, § 2.

46-15-10.
Public nuisances — Abatement.

Any violation of any provision of this chapter, any rule or regulation promulgated pursuant to this chapter, or any term or condition of any permit, shall constitute a public nuisance. Any person, municipality, municipal water department or agency, special water district, or private water company, committing a violation shall be liable for the costs of abatement of any pollution and any public nuisance caused by the violation. The superior court is hereby given jurisdiction over actions to recover the costs of the abatement.

Any activity or condition declared by this chapter to be a nuisance or which is otherwise in violation of this chapter, shall be abatable in the manner provided by law or equity for the abatement of public nuisances. In addition, the water resources board may proceed in equity to abate nuisances or to restrain or prevent any violation of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 461, § 4; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 30, § 2.

46-15-11.
Penalties and remedies.

It shall be the duty of any person to comply with any order issued pursuant to this chapter. If the person fails to comply with the order within such time, if any, as may be specified, the order may be enforced by the superior court, upon application made by the water resources board.

Any person who willfully or negligently violates any provision of this chapter, or any rule or regulation or other order promulgated by the water resources board, or any condition of any permit issued pursuant to the chapter, is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be subject to a fine of not more than five hundred ($500) dollars for each separate offense or to imprisonment for a period of not more than one year, or both.

In addition to proceeding under any other remedy available at law or in equity for a violation of any provision of this chapter, any rule or regulation pursuant to this chapter, or any term or condition of any permit issued pursuant to this chapter, the water resources board may assess a civil penalty upon a person for the violation. The penalty may be assessed whether or not the violation was willful or negligent. When the water resources board assesses a civil penalty, it shall inform the person of the amount of the penalty. The person charged with the penalty shall then have thirty (30) days to pay the penalty in full or, if the person wishes to contest either the amount of the penalty or the fact of the violation, the person shall, within the thirty (30) day period, file an appeal of the action with the water resources board. Failure to appeal within thirty (30) days shall result in a waiver of all legal rights to contest the violation or the amount of the penalty. The maximum civil penalty which may be assessed pursuant to this section is five thousand dollars ($5,000) per day for each violation. Each violation for each separate day and each violation of any provision of this chapter, any rule or regulation under this chapter, any order of the water resources board, or any term or condition of a permit shall constitute a separate and distinct offense under this section.

The penalties and remedies prescribed shall be deemed concurrent, and the existence of or exercise of any remedy shall not prevent the water resources board from exercising any other remedy hereunder.

Violations on separate days shall constitute separate offenses for purposes of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 461, § 4; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 30, § 2.

46-15-12.
Cemeteries affecting water supply.

In the event that any sites, lands, or other property acquired by the board pursuant to chapter 15.1 of this title, and/or in accordance with chapter 6 of title 37, as amended, for the purpose of constructing or maintaining a reservoir or other terraneous or subterraneous supply, transmission, or distribution of potable water, contain any burial ground, cemetery, historic cemetery, graves, or places of human burial, and if these places are to be flowed by water or are located so near to the reservoir or other water source as to be likely to pollute or reduce the quality or value of the waters as a potable water supply, the water resources board shall remove the remains found in the burial places.

The removal is to be under the direction of a qualified funeral director and with the approval of the next of kin of the deceased, and at the expense of the water resources board. However, notwithstanding the foregoing, the board shall only be liable for those expenses associated with removal of the remains and existing headstone, and transfer and reinterment of the remains within the state of Rhode Island. In the event that the next of kin desires to have the remains transported or reinterred outside of the boundaries of the state of Rhode Island, any and all expenses related to the transportation and reinterment outside of the state of Rhode Island shall be the responsibility of the next of kin.

No cadaver or remains shall be removed by the water resources board unless the water resources board shall give notice by certified mail to the nearest of kin known to the water resources board, and/or, in the case where no kin is known to the water resources board, by advertising in one or more daily newspapers having circulation within the town or city wherein the cemetery is located, at least once a week for three (3) successive weeks. The advertisement shall set forth the names of the deceased and the date of death, if the information is known or otherwise reasonably discernible from available records, as well as, the present location of the cemetery or burial site.

In the event that no kin is known or that the nearest of kin shall neglect or refuse to approve the removal and reinterment, the water resources board shall cause the cadavers or remains to be removed, transferred, and interred in such other cemetery in accordance with the laws, rules, and regulations of the religious denomination, if any shall be known or ascertained, to which the deceased subscribed. The water resources board may, at its option, furnish a place or places for these burials, and may establish a general burial ground or grounds therefor, and may acquire by purchase or condemnation any lands needed therefor. No general burial ground or grounds shall be established in any town without the prior approval of the town council of the town of the location or locations thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 461, § 4; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 30, § 2.

46-15-13.
Water supply planning.

The division of planning shall study and evaluate the needs of the state for current and future water supply and shall have the following powers:

To formulate and maintain a long range guide plan and implementing program for development of major water resources and transmission systems needed to furnish water to regional or local public water systems as part of the state guide plan adopted pursuant to §

42-11-10

.

To provide for cooperative development, conservation, and use of water resources by the state, municipal agencies or departments, water resources board, and public water systems, including special water districts and privately owned public water systems, the division of planning may:

Divide the state into areas for the purpose of providing water supply facilities;

Designate municipal water departments or agencies, special districts, or privately owned public water systems to perform area-wide water supply operations within each area.

To review all plans and proposals for construction or installation of facilities for water supply for conformance with the state guide plan in accordance with §

46-15-2

and report its findings to the water resources board.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 461, § 4; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 30, § 2.

46-15-14.
Emergencies and imminent hazards.

The division of planning, subject to the approval of the governor, shall promulgate an adequate plan for the provision of safe drinking water for the inhabitants of the state when a water emergency has been declared by the governor. A water emergency shall include floods or situations in which water supplies are insufficient to meet the needs of the inhabitants of the state either through a water shortage or contamination of water supplies. In a water emergency, the governor may take such actions and issue such orders as may be necessary to implement the plan, including the imposition of conservation measures and the allocation of water supplies. The actions and orders may be directed to state agencies, municipalities, or entities engaged in the sale of water to the public. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the responsibility for setting rates for the purchase and sale of water shall not be affected by this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 461, § 4; P.L. 2002, ch. 180, § 1.

46-15-15.
Consultants.

The water resources board is authorized to employ such technical consultants as may be required by the board for the proper performance of its powers and duties within the limit of funds provided therefor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 461, § 4; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 30, § 2.

46-15-16.
Examination of books, records, and accounts.

For the purpose of ascertaining material information relevant to the function of the powers and duties of the water resources board, the water resources board may freely examine at any time the books, records, and accounts of any municipal water department, special water district, or private water company.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 461, § 4; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 30, § 2.

46-15-17.
Filing reports.

The water resources board, on behalf of the board, may require any municipal water department, special water district, or private water company at a designated time or times, to file with its statements and reports, in such form as it may prescribe, covering any data or information which it deems necessary or proper to enable it to carry into effect the applicable provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 461, § 4; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 30, § 2.

46-15-18.
Relations with other governmental bodies and agencies.

In order to adequately protect the interests of the state in its water resources, the water resources board is hereby authorized to:

Cooperate with the appropriate agencies of the federal government, of the state or other states, or any interstate bureau, group, division, or agency with respect to the use of ground and surface waters, which are without or wholly or partially contained within this state, and to endeavor to harmonize any conflicting claims which may arise therefrom.

Appear, represent, and act for the state in respect to any proceeding before either a federal or state governmental body or agency where the water resources of the state may be affected, and may do and perform such acts in connection therewith as it deems proper to protect the interests of the state.

Present for the consideration of the congress or officers of the federal government, as occasion requires, the just rights of the state in relation to its waters, and institute and prosecute appropriate actions and proceedings to secure those rights, and defend any action or proceeding calculated to impair those rights.

Facilitate, encourage and support water resources management on a watershed basis, in a manner that supports systems level planning.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 461, § 4; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 30, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 159, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 254, § 2.

46-15-19.
Construction of references.

Whenever in any general or public law the words,
“water resources coordinating board”
or

“the director of the department of the environment”

shall appear, the same shall be deemed to refer to and to mean the

“water resources board”

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 461, § 4; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 30, § 2.

46-15-20.
Exemption from taxation.

The exercise of the powers granted by this chapter will be in all respects for the benefit of the people of the state, for the increase of their commerce, welfare, and prosperity, and for the improvement of their health and living conditions, and will constitute the performance of an essential government function, and neither the water resources board nor any municipal water agency, or department, or special water district to whom the water resources board has leased any of its properties or other facilities, shall or may be required to pay taxes or assessments upon or in respect of those properties or facilities acquired, leased, or used by the water resources board under the provisions of this chapter, or upon any improvements constructed on property owned by the board by any municipal water agency, or department, or special water district, or upon the income therefrom; provided, however, the general assembly may direct payments in lieu of taxes to be paid to a city or town in which those properties or facilities are located.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 461, § 4.

46-15-21.
Reporting requirements.

Within ninety (90) days after the end of each fiscal year, the board shall approve and submit an annual report to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, and the president of the senate and the secretary of state of its activities during that fiscal year. The report shall provide:

A summary of the board’s meetings including when the board and its committees met, subjects addressed, decisions rendered and meeting minutes; a summary of the board’s actions including a listing of the proposals and plans for public water supply systems received; hearings held, findings, assessments, recommendations, and decisions rendered concerning proposed projects for public water supply systems; water supply studies conducted; consents issued for transport of water to another state; decisions rendered requiring or authorizing a water supplier to provide water to other water supply systems; rules and regulations promulgated; violations and penalties assessed; actions taken to abate nuisances or restrain or prevent violations, and any actions taken to investigate the activities of municipal water departments, special water districts or private water companies; a synopsis of the hearings, complaints, suspensions, or other legal matters related to the authority of the board; a summary of any training courses held pursuant to subdivision 46-15.1-5.2(2); a consolidated financial statement of all funds received and expended by the board including the source of the funds; a listing of the staff and/or consultants employed by the board; and a listing of findings and recommendation derived from board activities.

The report shall be posted electronically as prescribed in §

42-20-8.2

. The director of the department of administration shall be responsible for the enforcement of the provisions of this subsection.

Forthwith upon passage of this act, and within ninety (90) days of the end of the fiscal year 2006, the board shall submit to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, and the president of the senate an annual work plan for the upcoming fiscal year. Said annual work plan shall list the tasks the board plans on working on over the course of the upcoming fiscal year including a description of how the elements are consistent with and supportive of the systems level plan developed and implemented by the Rhode Island Bays, Rivers, and Watersheds Coordination Team, as prescribed in §

46-31-5

.

Within ninety (90) days of the end of the fiscal year 2006, and within ninety (90) days after the end of each fiscal year thereafter, the board shall submit to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, the president of the senate and the secretary of state an annual performance report for that fiscal year. Said report shall describe and evaluate the successes and shortcomings of the implementation of the annual work plan pertaining to that fiscal year, and shall include a summary of progress made in the following areas: formulation and maintenance of a long range guide plan and implementing program for the development of major water resources and transmission systems, as prescribed in §

46-15-13

; promulgation of an emergency plan for water supplies in the event of a water emergency declaration by the governor, as prescribed in §

46-15-14

; and actions undertaken for the cooperative development, conservation, and use of state water resources, as prescribed in §

46-15-13

. The report shall be posted electronically as prescribed in §

42-20-8.2

. The director of the department of administration shall be responsible for the enforcement of the provisions of this subsection.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 461, § 4; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 30, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 104, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 126, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 48.

46-15-22.
Transfer of powers and functions to the water resources board.

There are hereby transferred to the water resources board:

Those functions of the department of administration which were administered through or with respect to board programs in the performance of strategic planning as defined in §

42-11-10(c)

;

All officers, employees, agencies, advisory councils, committees, commissions, and task forces who were performing strategic planning functions as defined in §

42-11-10(c)

; and

Those duties and functions of the statewide planning program for support to the Rhode Island rivers council.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 461, § 4; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 30, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 159, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 254, § 2.

46-15-23.
Coastal resources management council.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall abrogate or affect the powers and duties of the coastal resources management council under chapter 23 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 461, § 4.